Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Cross references. —

As to constitutional amendments, see §

22-20-101

et seq.

Revision of title. —

Sections 1 to 4, ch. 37, Laws 1978, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

8-1-101

to

8-3-109

and

8-5-101

to 8-7-205 as §§

8-1-101

to

8-5-102

, by § 1, ch. 37, Laws 1978, amending and renumbering §§

8-4-101

to

8-4-110

as §§

22-20-201

to

22-20-209

, by § 2, ch. 37, Laws 1978, amending and renumbering § 9-2-215 as §

8-2-101

, by § 3, ch. 37, Laws 1978, and repealing § 8-10.11, by § 4, ch. 37, Laws 1978. No detailed explanation of changes made by the 1978 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they will be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Section 5, ch. 37, Laws 1978, reads: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming Legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Section 6, ch. 37, Laws 1978, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Section 7, ch. 37, Laws 1978, reads: “This act is effective May 27, 1978.”